Utah statutes.
58-56-11.   Standards for specialized buildings.

(1)  This chapter shall not be implied to repeal or otherwise affect authorities granted to a state agency to make or administer standards for specialized buildings, as provided in Title 26, Chapter 21, Health Care Facility Licensure and Inspection Act, Title 26, Chapter 39, Utah Child Care Licensing Act, Title 62A, Chapter 2, Licensure of Programs and Facilities, and Title 64, Chapter 13, Department of Corrections - State Prison, or authorities granted to a state agency by statute to make or administer other special standards.  In the event of a conflict between such special standards and codes adopted pursuant to this chapter, the special standards shall prevail.

(2)  The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the administration of the statutes described in Subsection (1).

